Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-662
Plan of government; abandoning; petition; filing; election.

Whenever electors of any city, equal in number to thirty percent of those who voted at the last regular city election, shall file a petition with the city clerk, asking that the question of abandoning the plan of government provided by the provisions of Chapter 19, article 6, be submitted to the electors thereof, such clerk shall within one week certify that fact to the council of the city, and the council shall, within thirty days, adopt a resolution to provide for submitting such question at the next regular municipal election after adoption of the resolution. When such a petition is filed with the city clerk within a seventy-day period prior to a regular municipal election, the resolution adopted by the city council shall provide for the submission of such question at the second regular municipal election thereafter as provided by law.

Laws 1974, LB 897, § 3.